Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 4. Examinations, Reports, Records.

Sec. 06.55.401.
Authority to conduct examinations.

The department may conduct an annual examination of a money services licensee or of any of its authorized delegates upon 45 days’ notice in a record to the money services licensee.

The department may examine a money services licensee or its authorized delegate, at any time, without notice, if the department has reason to believe that the money services licensee or authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice or has violated or is violating this chapter or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter.

If the department concludes that an on-site examination is necessary under (a) of this section, the money services licensee shall pay the reasonable cost of the examination.

Information obtained during an examination under this chapter may be disclosed only as provided in AS

06.55.407

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations, reports, and records, see 3 AAC 13, art. 3.

Sec. 06.55.402.
Cooperation.

The department may consult and cooperate with other state money services regulators in enforcing and administering this chapter. The department and other state money service regulators may jointly pursue examinations and take other official action that they are otherwise empowered to take.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.403.
Reports.

A money services licensee shall file with the department within 15 business days any material changes in information provided in a money services licensee’s application as prescribed by the department.

A money services licensee shall file with the department within 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter a current list of all authorized delegates and locations in this state where the money services licensee or an authorized delegate of the money services licensee provides money services, including mobile locations. The money services licensee shall state the name and street address of each location and authorized delegate.

A money services licensee shall file a report with the department within one business day after the money services licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of any of the following events:

the filing of a petition by or against the money services licensee under 11 U.S.C. 101 — 110 (Bankruptcy Code) for bankruptcy or reorganization;

the filing of a petition by or against the money services licensee for receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;

the commencement of a proceeding to revoke or suspend its money services license in a state or country in which the money services licensee engages in business or is licensed;

the cancellation or other impairment of the money services licensee’s bond or other security;

a charge against or conviction of the money services licensee or of an executive officer, manager, director, or person in control of the money services licensee for a felony; or

a charge against or conviction of an authorized delegate for a felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, see 3 AAC 13, art. 2.

Sec. 06.55.404.
Change of control.

A money services licensee shall

give the department notice in a record of a proposed change of control within 15 days after learning of the proposed change of control;

request approval of the acquisition; and

submit a nonrefundable fee with the notice.

After review of a request for approval under (a) of this section, the department may require the money services licensee to provide additional information concerning the proposed persons in control of the money services licensee. The additional information must be limited to the same types required of the money services licensee or persons in control of the money services licensee as part of its original money services license or renewal application.

The department shall approve a request for change of control under (a) of this section if, after investigation, the department determines that the person or group of persons requesting approval has the competence, experience, character, and general fitness to operate the money services licensee or person in control of the money services licensee in a lawful and proper manner and that the public interest will not be jeopardized by the change of control.

When an application for a change of control under AS

06.55.401

—

06.55.407

is complete, the department shall notify the money services licensee in a record of the date on which the request was determined to be complete, and

the department shall approve or deny the request within 120 days after that date; or

if the request is not approved or denied within 120 days after that date,

the request is approved; and

the department shall permit the change of control under this section, to take effect as of the first business day after expiration of the period.

The department, by regulation or order, may exempt a person from any of the requirements of (a)(2) and (3) of this section if it is in the public interest to exempt the person.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to a public offering of securities.

Before filing a request for approval to acquire control of a money services licensee or person in control of a money services licensee, a person may request in a record a determination from the department as to whether the person would be considered a person in control of a money services licensee upon consummation of a proposed transaction. If the department determines that the person would not be a person in control of a money services licensee, the department shall enter an order to that effect, and the proposed person and transaction are not subject to the requirements of (a) — (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, see 3 AAC 13, art. 2.

Sec. 06.55.405.
Records.

A money services licensee shall maintain the following records for determining its compliance with this chapter for at least three years:

a record of each payment instrument or stored-value obligation sold;

a general ledger posted at least monthly containing all asset, liability, capital, income, and expense accounts;

bank statements and bank reconciliation records;

records of outstanding payment instruments and stored-value obligations;

records of each payment instrument and stored-value obligation paid within the three-year period;

a list of the last known names and addresses of all of the money services licensee’s authorized delegates; and

any other records the department reasonably requires by regulation.

The items specified in (a) of this section may be maintained in any form of record.

Records may be maintained outside this state if they are made accessible to the department on seven business days’ notice that is sent in a record.

All records maintained by the money services licensee as required in (a) — (c) of this section are open to inspection by the department under AS

06.55.401

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations, reports, and records, see 3 AAC 13, art. 3.

Sec. 06.55.406.
Money laundering reports.

A money services licensee and an authorized delegate shall file with the attorney general all reports required by federal currency reporting, record keeping, and suspicious transaction reporting requirements as set out in 31 U.S.C. 5311 and other federal and state laws pertaining to money laundering.

The timely filing of a complete and accurate report required under (a) of this section with the appropriate federal agency is compliance with the requirements of (a) of this section, unless the department notifies the money services licensee that the attorney general has notified the department that reports of this type are not being regularly and comprehensively transmitted by the federal agency to the attorney general.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007; am § 8 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), deleted “, 31 C.F.R. 103,” following “31 U.S.C. 5311”.

Editor's notes. —

Subsection (a) refers to
31 C.F.R. 103 but this section does not exist.
It is possible that this reference was intended to refer to
31 C.F.R. Part 103.
In 2011,
31 C.F.R. Part 103 was transferred to 31 C.F.R. Chapter X.

Sec. 06.55.407.
Confidentiality.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, all information or reports obtained by the department from an applicant, a licensee, or an authorized delegate are confidential and not subject to disclosure under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

, including

all information contained in or related to examination, investigation, operating, or condition reports prepared by, on behalf of, or for the use of the department; and

financial statements, balance sheets, and authorized delegate information.

The department may disclose information that is not otherwise subject to disclosure under (a) of this section to representatives of state or federal agencies who promise in a record that they will maintain the confidentiality of the information or if the department finds that the release is reasonably necessary for the protection of the public and in the interests of justice, and the money services licensee has been given previous notice by the department of its intent to release the information.

This section does not prohibit the department from disclosing to the public a list of money services licensees or the aggregated financial data concerning those money services licensees.

A money services licensee or an authorized delegate may not disclose to another person financial information provided to the money services licensee or the authorized delegate by a customer except when, and only to the extent that, the disclosure is

authorized in writing by the customer;

required by federal, state, or local law;

required by an order issued by a court or an administrative agency; or

part of the money services transaction ordered by the customer.

In (d) of this section, “financial information” means an individual’s social security number, individual taxpayer identification number, account number, credit card account number, debit card account number, personal identification number, payment instrument number, or access code.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations, reports, and records, see 3 AAC 13, art. 3.